dict-sa-Deva/sa-Deva.aff
FLAG NUM
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 0 अमानेभ्यः .
SFX 1911 Y 1
SFX 1911 0 तव्याभ्यः .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 ष्यमाणेषु .
SFX 2962 Y 1
SFX 2962 0 आहात्म्यम् .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 0 यमाणायाम् .
SFX 4952 Y 1
SFX 4952 0 क्याम् .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 स्थेन .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 अमानायाः .
SFX 4472 Y 1
SFX 4472 0 ज्ञ .
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 0 ज्ञे .
SFX 2985 Y 1
SFX 2985 0 विधयः .
SFX 2841 Y 1
SFX 2841 0 मयोः .
SFX 4832 Y 1
SFX 4832 0 निभिः .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 भूतम् .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 भूतौ .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 ज्ञम् .
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 0 ज्ञौ .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 इतायाम् .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 0 आहात्म्यैः .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 व्याभिः .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 यिष्यथ .
SFX 1466 Y 1
SFX 1466 0 इष्यमाणायाम् .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 हाम् .
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 0 हान् .
SFX 3031 Y 1
SFX 3031 0 हात् .
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 0 लक्षण .
SFX 4289 Y 1
SFX 4289 0 लक्षणे .
SFX 4041 Y 1
SFX 4041 0 अवे .
SFX 3621 Y 1
SFX 3621 0 व्रतेषु .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 सेन .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 0 सेने .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 सारयोः .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 कया .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 0 आहात्म्ययोः .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 0 यमाण .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 यमाणे .
SFX 3336 Y 1
SFX 3336 0 पैः .
SFX 2329 Y 1
SFX 2329 0 दतः .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 दानाभ्याम् .
SFX 1895 Y 1
SFX 1895 0 इना .
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 0 अवद्भिः .
SFX 3138 Y 1
SFX 3138 0 हा .
SFX 2523 Y 1
SFX 2523 0 अयेतम् .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 इतास्वः .
SFX 3189 Y 1
SFX 3189 0 करण .
SFX 3601 Y 1
SFX 3601 0 करणे .
SFX 3203 Y 1
SFX 3203 0 अमाणया .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 अन्तः .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 येत् .
SFX 4050 Y 1
SFX 4050 0 र्मणोः .
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 0 वतीम् .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 0 देवाः .
SFX 2017 Y 1
SFX 2017 0 णीयाम् .
SFX 1848 Y 1
SFX 1848 0 णीयान् .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 णीयात् .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 त्रेभ्यः .
SFX 4593 Y 1
SFX 4593 0 तकात् .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 अयिष्यमाणः .
SFX 3890 Y 1
SFX 3890 0 प्रकाशम् .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 प्रकाशौ .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 पयोः .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 आनेषु .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 तवत्योः .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 इभ्यः .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 यमानानाम् .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 अयेव .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 0 अणीयाभ्यः .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 स्थतः .
SFX 4896 Y 1
SFX 4896 0 स्थानानाम् .
SFX 3644 Y 1
SFX 3644 0 प्रकाश .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 प्रकाशे .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 ष्यमाणासु .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 माय .
SFX 4168 Y 1
SFX 4168 0 न्ताः .
SFX 4510 Y 1
SFX 4510 0 पालानाम् .
SFX 2482 Y 1
SFX 2482 0 गतः .
SFX 2613 Y 1
SFX 2613 0 अयिष्येथे .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 कस्य .
SFX 3549 Y 1
SFX 3549 0 पुरेषु .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 यिष्यमाणायाम् .
SFX 2142 Y 1
SFX 2142 0 णीयासु .
SFX 1362 Y 1
SFX 1362 0 इष्यन्तीभ्यः .
SFX 1933 Y 1
SFX 1933 0 जेषु .
SFX 4711 Y 1
SFX 4711 0 ल्यः .
SFX 3176 Y 1
SFX 3176 0 अमाणस्य .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 कायै .
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 0 अन्तीभ्यः .
SFX 3676 Y 1
SFX 3676 0 वृत्तौ .
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 0 रसाभ्याम् .
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 0 इष्यमाणेषु .
SFX 4872 Y 1
SFX 4872 0 भृता .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 सयोः .
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 0 दत्ताय .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 उखः .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 अमाणेषु .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 कल्पस्य .
SFX 4660 Y 1
SFX 4660 0 भाष्यात् .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 ण्यः .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 उखाः .
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 0 लक्षणानाम् .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 ष्यन्ती .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 0 तवन्तम् .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 तवन्तौ .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 ताभिः .
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 0 अयिष्यता .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 अयिष्यती .
SFX 4342 Y 1
SFX 4342 0 पदेभ्यः .
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 0 रणानि .
SFX 3402 Y 1
SFX 3402 0 पद्धतिभिः .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 इष्यन्तीम् .
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 0 ष्यन्तीः .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 जतः .
SFX 3096 Y 1
SFX 3096 0 अयमानेषु .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 इष्यन्तः .
SFX 1428 Y 1
SFX 1428 0 तारः .
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 वतीभ्यः .
SFX 3390 Y 1
SFX 3390 0 पद्धत्याम् .
SFX 4451 Y 1
SFX 4451 0 लक्षणैः .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 नाथानाम् .
SFX 3531 Y 1
SFX 3531 0 राजान् .
SFX 3457 Y 1
SFX 3457 0 राजात् .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 टाः .
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 0 अयिष्यमाणानाम् .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 0 यिष्यसे .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 यिष्यसि .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 अयन्तम् .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 अयन्तौ .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 0 यन्त्याम् .
SFX 4354 Y 1
SFX 4354 0 अन्त्रम् .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 र्माणि .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 यितव्यायाम् .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 श्वरः .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 आरम् .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 आरौ .
SFX 2414 Y 1
SFX 2414 0 वयोः .
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 0 वै .
SFX 1701 Y 1
SFX 1701 0 वम् .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 वन् .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 वत् .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 वौ .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 याभिः .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 यन्तीभिः .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 न्तीभ्याम् .
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 0 इष्यन्तीनाम् .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 0 मतः .
SFX 3365 Y 1
SFX 3365 0 देवेभ्यः .
SFX 4606 Y 1
SFX 4606 0 कल्पानाम् .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 0 करैः .
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 0 सारेषु .
SFX 4096 Y 1
SFX 4096 0 सूत्रेषु .
SFX 4930 Y 1
SFX 4930 0 दानाय .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 यिष्यमाणेभ्यः .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 0 तव्यानाम् .
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 0 दत्तम् .
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 0 दत्तौ .
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 0 जेन .
SFX 907 Y 1
SFX 907 0 माणाय .
SFX 4432 Y 1
SFX 4432 0 अवता .
SFX 1179 Y 1
SFX 1179 0 आमहै .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 लक्षणात् .
SFX 838 Y 1
SFX 838 0 माणम् .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 माणौ .
SFX 2988 Y 1
SFX 2988 0 सारतः .
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 0 दत्तान् .
SFX 4648 Y 1
SFX 4648 0 दत्तात् .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 गतानाम् .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 वः .
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 0 तवतोः .
SFX 2032 Y 1
SFX 2032 0 यिष्यमाणायाः .
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 0 पुत्राः .
SFX 2630 Y 1
SFX 2630 0 अयिष्यमाणानि .
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 ययोः .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 अयितास्थः .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 वतीषु .
SFX 3291 Y 1
SFX 3291 0 मुखयोः .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 अद्भिः .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 मालासु .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 अय .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 अये .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 नाथाभ्याम् .
SFX 4429 Y 1
SFX 4429 0 अयेण .
SFX 1957 Y 1
SFX 1957 0 यिष्यते .
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 0 यिष्यति .
SFX 3574 Y 1
SFX 3574 0 तमेन .
SFX 3519 Y 1
SFX 3519 0 स्तोत्रम् .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 तव्येषु .
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 0 माहात्म्यानि .
SFX 2504 Y 1
SFX 2504 0 अयन्त्याम् .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 वृत्तये .
SFX 2567 Y 1
SFX 2567 0 अयिष्यन्ती .
SFX 1482 Y 1
SFX 1482 0 इष्यमाणेन .
SFX 1168 Y 1
SFX 1168 0 ईयासु .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 इतया .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 कल्पेभ्यः .
SFX 1896 Y 1
SFX 1896 0 अकाः .
SFX 4315 Y 1
SFX 4315 0 दत्त .
SFX 4387 Y 1
SFX 4387 0 दत्ते .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ण .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 णे .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 णि .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 0 पतः .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 रिणा .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 व्या .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 अमानायाम् .
SFX 2641 Y 1
SFX 2641 0 अयिष्यमाणा .
SFX 2730 Y 1
SFX 2730 0 त्रा .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 नीयेषु .
SFX 3245 Y 1
SFX 3245 0 कृतस्य .
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 0 व्रतानि .
SFX 4362 Y 1
SFX 4362 0 वनानाम् .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 त्योः .
SFX 3563 Y 1
SFX 3563 0 तन्त्रेषु .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 0 दीपिके .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 तवत्या .
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 0 अयन्ते .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 अयन्ति .
SFX 2536 Y 1
SFX 2536 0 अयन्तु .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 अन्तम् .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 अन्तौ .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 अयितव्ययोः .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 ष्यमाण .
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 0 ष्यमाणे .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 माणैः .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 दानैः .
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 0 अयितव्यासु .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 अयन्तीभ्याम् .
SFX 2704 Y 1
SFX 2704 0 अयेय .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 तमम् .
SFX 3650 Y 1
SFX 3650 0 तमौ .
SFX 3179 Y 1
SFX 3179 0 अमाणम् .
SFX 3173 Y 1
SFX 3173 0 अमाणौ .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 अयान् .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 अयात् .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 अयिष्यमाणेन .
SFX 2589 Y 1
SFX 2589 0 अयिष्यामः .
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 0 वृत्तिः .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 नाः .
SFX 2928 Y 1
SFX 2928 0 तॄणाम् .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 तमैः .
SFX 4398 Y 1
SFX 4398 0 अन्त्राणाम् .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 इतस्य .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 सतः .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 यमानैः .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 नीयाम् .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 नीयान् .
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 0 नीयात् .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 0 भावैः .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 दानाम् .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 दानात् .
SFX 4906 Y 1
SFX 4906 0 रहस्येन .
SFX 4307 Y 1
SFX 4307 0 राम् .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 रान् .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 0 रात् .
SFX 3047 Y 1
SFX 3047 0 तीर्थयोः .
SFX 4113 Y 1
SFX 4113 0 स्थैः .
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 0 यिष्यन्त्या .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 सार .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 सारे .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 अयेरन् .
SFX 2004 Y 1
SFX 2004 0 यिष्यद्भ्याम् .
SFX 1300 Y 1
SFX 1300 0 इतास्मि .
SFX 3117 Y 1
SFX 3117 0 अयमानाभ्याम् .
SFX 1737 Y 1
SFX 1737 0 अयेभ्यः .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 व्यासु .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 टायै .
SFX 3516 Y 1
SFX 3516 0 स्तोत्रात् .
SFX 3109 Y 1
SFX 3109 0 अयमानासु .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 0 अयितव्येषु .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 पतयः .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 माणाभ्याम् .
SFX 2351 Y 1
SFX 2351 0 टम् .
SFX 2334 Y 1
SFX 2334 0 टौ .
SFX 2696 Y 1
SFX 2696 0 अणीय .
SFX 2716 Y 1
SFX 2716 0 अणीये .
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 0 वृत्ते .
SFX 3609 Y 1
SFX 3609 0 वृत्ति .
SFX 3961 Y 1
SFX 3961 0 वादान् .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 वादात् .
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 0 इताम् .
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 0 इतान् .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 इतात् .
SFX 3021 Y 1
SFX 3021 0 माहात्म्ययोः .
SFX 3968 Y 1
SFX 3968 0 स्थानाम् .
SFX 4895 Y 1
SFX 4895 0 स्थानात् .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 पतौ .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 मभ्याम् .
SFX 2938 Y 1
SFX 2938 0 अणीयया .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 साराभ्याम् .
SFX 1574 Y 1
SFX 1574 0 आणः .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 ष्यमाणा .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 तीर्थाय .
SFX 3623 Y 1
SFX 3623 0 व्रतेभ्यः .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 न्याम् .
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 0 आलाभ्यः .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 क्षान् .
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 0 क्षात् .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 विधितः .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 एण .
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 0 काराणाम् .
SFX 4516 Y 1
SFX 4516 0 मालाभ्याम् .
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 0 श्वरान् .
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 0 श्वरात् .
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 0 दत्ताः .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 वतः .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 नां .
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 0 गानाम् .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 प्रकाशस्य .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 त्वस्य .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 अयिष्यमाणाः .
SFX 3752 Y 1
SFX 3752 0 प्रयोगाः .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 भाष्ययोः .
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 0 आलयोः .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 णीयाभ्याम् .
SFX 3083 Y 1
SFX 3083 0 अयमानाम् .
SFX 3112 Y 1
SFX 3112 0 अयमानान् .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 अयमानात् .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 र्यै .
SFX 3612 Y 1
SFX 3612 0 र्यौ .
SFX 2526 Y 1
SFX 2526 0 नया .
SFX 3498 Y 1
SFX 3498 0 सैः .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 इष्यद्भिः .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 यिष्यन्तीभिः .
SFX 4825 Y 1
SFX 4825 0 वानि .
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 0 आथे .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 इताभ्याम् .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 वादाय .
SFX 1067 Y 1
SFX 1067 0 ईयाः .
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 0 स्थानस्य .
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 0 कल्प .
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 0 कल्पे .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 अयसे .
SFX 2535 Y 1
SFX 2535 0 अयसि .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 तेः .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 यितव्यम् .
SFX 1872 Y 1
SFX 1872 0 यितव्यौ .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 दानानाम् .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 अणीयस्य .
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 0 पत्योः .
SFX 4942 Y 1
SFX 4942 0 र्ण .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 अणीयायाम् .
SFX 3452 Y 1
SFX 3452 0 राजेषु .
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 यतः .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 यमाणम् .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 0 यमाणौ .
SFX 3845 Y 1
SFX 3845 0 मुखतः .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 तव्यः .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 जानाम् .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 आभ्याम् .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 तकस्य .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 इः .
SFX 3338 Y 1
SFX 3338 0 मुखेभ्यः .
SFX 3517 Y 1
SFX 3517 0 स्तोत्रस्य .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 रस .
SFX 4419 Y 1
SFX 4419 0 रसे .
SFX 4783 Y 1
SFX 4783 0 ष्टेषु .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 यिष्यावः .
SFX 3576 Y 1
SFX 3576 0 तमाय .
SFX 3121 Y 1
SFX 3121 0 अयमान .
SFX 3099 Y 1
SFX 3099 0 अयमाने .
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 0 काराः .
SFX 4121 Y 1
SFX 4121 0 अत्या .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 रूपाय .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 वृत्त्योः .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 शेन .
